Massachusetts, session 194th, S2200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 75, the following sections:-
Section 76. (a) The general court shall establish, with the approval of the presiding
officers of the 2 branches of the general court, a program under which the senate, house of
representatives, or general court may agree to repay, by direct payment on behalf of an
employee, student loans previously taken out by an employee. For purposes of this section, a
Member of the general court shall not be considered to be an employee of the Senate or House of
Representatives.
of 2

(b) The general court or an administrative authority thereof shall promulgate such
guidelines as may be necessary to carry out the program under this section, and may include
limitations on the type of student loans covered and on the maximum payment that may be
available to any one individual.
(c) The administration of the program authorized in this section shall be funded by
appropriations directed to the general court, or a branch thereof, subject to appropriation.
Section 73. (a) The general court shall establish, with the approval of the presiding
officers of the 2 branches of the general court, biannual review of employee compensation. Such
base compensation shall be re-evaluated to ensure employee pay keeps pace with the median
household income for the commonwealth for the preceding two-year period.
of 2